PortableApps/FocusWriterPortable/App/FocusWriter/dictionaries/hy.dic
ածխացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
աղքատացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ամայացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ամլացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անառակացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անգունացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անզորացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անհանգստացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անշարժացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անպետքացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
անցնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
աշխարհականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ապակենտրոնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ապամագնիսացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ապստամբեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
առաքինացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ավելացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
արածեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
արդիացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
արմատացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բախտավորացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բանեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բարդացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բարկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բերրիացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բիրտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բյուրեղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բուսցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
բրտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գազիֆիկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գաղութաբնակեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գայթակղեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գերհագեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գժվացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գիրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գմփգմփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գոլորշիացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գոռգոռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գռգռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
գտնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
դաժանացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դեղնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դժվարացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դղրդեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դյուրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դնդնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
դրմբացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
եկչել/CHVD00
երդվեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
երկարացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զարգացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զարհուրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զգոնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զնգացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զորեղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
զրխկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
էլեկտրականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
էվակուացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ընդհանրականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թանկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թացացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թթվեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թմրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թշշացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թռնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
թռչել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
թռցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
թփթփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ժպտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
իդեալացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
իջեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
իջնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
լավացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լենացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լիկվիդացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լկտիացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լռեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
լցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խամրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խեղճացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խզզացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խլշտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խնթացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խշրտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խոնարհացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խոպոպացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խորացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խռխռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խստացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
խրտչեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծանծաղացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծարավեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծլծլացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծծեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծնեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծորեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծպպացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծվացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կաթոլիկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կայունացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կանգնեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կատաղեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կարմրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կենտրոնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կերչել/CHVD00
կլիմայավարժեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կմախքացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կոկիկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կոնսերվացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կոոպերացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կորցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կպնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
կպչել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
կպցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կռկռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կսկծեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
կրճտեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հագնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
հազացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հաճեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
համայնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
համրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հայրենադարձնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
հանգստացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հանվեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հաշմանդամացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հաջողացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հասնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
հասունացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հավասարեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հատացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հարթեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հափրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հեծնել/CHVAVBVDDEA2G2INLO
հեղուկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հերոսացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հիբրիդացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հիվանդացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հոսեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հպատակեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
հրճվեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճաթեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճաքեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճկունացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճնկճնկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ճրթճրթացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մահմեդականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մասսայականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մարմնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մեղմացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մեռնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
մթնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
միջազգայնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մոխրացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մռմռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մտնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
մրսեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նեխեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նիհարացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նյութականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նույնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
նվաստացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շաղվեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շենացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շլմփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շմփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շշմեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շչեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շտապեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շրջանացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
շփփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ուժգնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ունակացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ուռցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ուրվականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չեզոքացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չխկրտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չմփացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չպչպացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չրխկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
չքացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պահածոյացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պանծացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պառավեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պատշաճեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պարեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պարզունակեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պերճացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պոռնկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պտտացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
պրծնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
պրոլետարացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ջերմացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ջրիկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ռամկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ռուսականացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սահմռկեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սասանեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սարսափեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սերտաճեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սթափեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սիրունցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սնանկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սովորեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սպիտակեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ստրկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սրթսրթացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վազեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վատացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վեհացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վերագտնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
վերահարցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վերացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վիժեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վուլկանացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վստահեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տաճկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տարաբնակեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տեղայնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տեսնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
տիպայնացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տկտկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
տռզեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ցածացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ցայտեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ցավեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ցոլեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փախնել/CHVAVDDEA2G2INLO
փակցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փափկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փխրեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փնչացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փողփողեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փոփոլացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
փսխեցնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
քարացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
քոռացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
օտարացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ֆրթացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
